en: Salami
de: Salami, Salamis
es: Salami
fi: salami
fr: Salamis, Salami
hr: salama
hu: Szalámi
it: Salame
ja: サラミ
nl: Salamis
pl: Salami
ru: Салями
sv: Salami
tr: Salam

en: Salami pork and beef
fr: Salami porc et boeuf

en: Pork salami
de: Schweinesalami
fi: Sianlihasalami
fr: Salami de porc
hr: Svinjska salama
nl: Varkensvleessalami

en: Spianata
it: Spianata

en: Ventricina
it: Ventricina

en: Salami ungherese, Hungarian Salami
fr: Salami ungherese, salami hongrois

en: Salami Danish-style
fr: Salami type danois

en: Beef salami
de: Rindersalami
fr: Salami de bœuf, Salamis de bœuf
hr: Goveđa salama

en: Turkey salami
fi: Kalkkunasalami
fr: Salami de dinde, Salamis de dinde
hr: Pureća salama
nl: Kalkoensalamis

en: Drubezi Sunkovi salami
cs: Drůbeží šunkový salám

en: Sunkovi salami
cs: Šunkový salám

en: Vyrobni salami
cs: Výrobní salám

en: Gothaj salami
cs: Gothajský salám
fr: Salami Gothaj

en: Polican salami
cs: Salám Poličan

en: Herkules salami
cs: Salám Herkules

en: Lovecky salami
cs: Lovecký salám

en: Selsky salami
cs: Selský salám

en: turisticky salami
cs: turistický salám

en: vysocina salami
cs: Salám vysočina

en: Chicken salami
fr: Salami de poulet, Salamis de poulet